Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 13 Dance Hall Operators

§ 33-13-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 138, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 59, § 1, related to license required for dance hall operators.

§ 33-13-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 138, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 59, § 2, related to conditions under which licenses may be issued to dance hall operators.

§ 33-13-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 138, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 59, § 3, related to revocation of dance hall operator licenses.

§ 33-13-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 138, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 59, § 4, related to exemption from dance hall operator license requirement.

§ 33-13-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 138, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 59, § 5, related to penalty for violation of act.